Nebraska, session 109, LB989.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB989 LB989
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $500,000 from the General
Fund for FY2026-27 to the Military Department, for Program 544, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of the Nebraska Nonprofit Security Grant
Program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$450,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $45,000
for FY2026-27.
-2-